Utah statutes.
17C-2-505.   Additional requirements for notice of a budget hearing.
Each notice under Section 17C-2-502 of a budget hearing shall contain:
(1)  the following statement:
"The (name of agency) has requested $________ in property tax revenues that
will be generated by development within the (name of project area) to fund a
portion of project costs within the (name of project area).  These property
tax revenues will be used for the following: (list major budget categories and
amounts).  These property taxes will be taxes levied by the following
governmental entities, and, assuming current tax rates, the taxes paid to the
agency for this project area from each taxing entity will be as follows: (list
each taxing entity levying taxes and the amount of total taxes that would be
paid from each taxing entity).  All of the property taxes to be paid to the
agency for the development in the project area are taxes that will be
generated only if the project area is developed.
All concerned citizens are invited to attend the project area budget hearing
scheduled for (date, time, and place of hearing).  A copy of the (name of
project area) project area budget is available at the offices of (name of
agency and office address)."; and
(2)  other information that the agency considers appropriate.
